Oklahoma, session 2026, SB176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 6060.3b of Title 36, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Contraceptive drugs” means all drugs approved by the United
States Food and Drug Administration that are used to prevent
pregnancy including but not limited to hormonal drugs administered
orally, transdermally, and intravaginally; and
2. “Health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan as defined
pursuant to Section 6060.4 of Title 36 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Any health benefit plan that is offered, issued, or renewed
on or after the effective date of this act that offers coverage for
contraceptive drugs shall provide coverage for an enrollee to
obtain:

1. A three-month supply of a contraceptive drug at once the
first time the enrollee obtains the drug; and
2. A six-month supply of the contraceptive drug at once each
subsequent time that the enrollee obtains the same drug, regardless
of whether the enrollee was enrolled in the health benefit plan the
first time that the enrollee obtained the drug.
An enrollee may obtain only one six-month supply of a covered
prescription drug during each six-month period.
C. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an
enrollee of a health benefit plan from requesting a smaller supply
or to prohibit a prescribing provider from prescribing a smaller
supply if such a prescription is supported by clinical utility and
medical appropriateness.
D. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require
coverage under a health benefit plan for any medications that could
be used to terminate an existing pregnancy.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 176 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 176 Page 3